Nevada, session 83, AB442.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 353 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 11, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 9, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
sections 3 to 7, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 3. 1. “Grant” means a legal instrument of financial
assistance between a state grant-making entity and a private
nonprofit corporation that is:
(a) Used to enter into a relationship for which the principal
purpose is to transfer anything of value from the state grant-
making entity to the private nonprofit corporation to carry out a
public purpose authorized by law and not to acquire real property
or services for the direct benefit or use of the state grant-making
entity;
(b) Used to provide for one or more payments in
reimbursement for services or other performance under the
agreement on a scheduled or other incremental basis; and
(c) Distinguished from a cooperative agreement in that it does
not provide for substantial involvement between the state grant-
making entity and the private nonprofit corporation in carrying
out the activity contemplated by the award.
2. The term does not include an instrument that provides
only:
(a) Direct government cash assistance to a person;
(b) A subsidy;
(c) A loan;
(d) A loan guarantee;
(e) Insurance;
(f) State funding that is required annually and is calculated
based on a formula set in statute; or
(g) Proceeds from a general obligation bond.
Sec. 4. “Payment” includes all processing and authorization
required by law from the State Board of Examiners, the Director
of the Office of Finance and the State Controller.
Sec. 5. “Private nonprofit corporation” means an
organization that has been granted tax-exempt status by the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Internal Revenue Service pursuant to the provisions of section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
Sec. 6. “Proper invoice” means a bill, a request for
reimbursement, a written document or an electronic submission
readable by the state grant-making entity that is provided by a
private nonprofit corporation and which:
1. Requests an eligible amount that is due and payable by law
under a written grant agreement with the private nonprofit
corporation; and
2. Includes:
(a) Sufficient information to identify the grant agreement; and
(b) Any additional information or documentation required by
the grant agreement or for compliance with 2 C.F.R. Part 200 or
any other state or federal law or regulation.
Sec. 7. “State grant-making entity” means an agency,
bureau, board, commission, department, division, officer or
employee of the Executive Department of the State Government
that makes a grant. The term does not include the Nevada System
of Higher Education or any institution of the Nevada System of
Higher Education.
Secs. 8 and 8.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. 1. If a state grant-making entity does not make a
payment for an amount that is due and payable by law under a
written grant agreement with a private nonprofit corporation
within 30 calendar days after receipt of a proper invoice, the state
grant-making entity shall, as soon as practicable after that 30-day
period, provide written notice to the private nonprofit corporation
of the reason for the delay in making the payment.
2. On or before October 1 of each year, the state grant-
making entity shall submit to the Director of the Office of Finance
and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to the Interim Finance Committee a compilation of the notices
provided pursuant to subsection 1 during the immediately
preceding fiscal year.
Secs. 10 and 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11.3. Chapter 223 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Office may coordinate and collaborate with state
grant-making entities to identify:
(a) Existing policies and procedures utilized by state grant-
making entities to administer advanced payments of grants;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(b) Best practices for monitoring and assessing the risks
associated with administration of advanced payments of grants;
and
(c) Methods for state grant-making entities to comply with 2
C.F.R. Part 200 and any other federal regulations governing the
administration of grants.
2. The Director may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
3. As used in this section, “state grant-making entity” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 7 of this act.
Sec. 11.5. NRS 223.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.460 As used in NRS 223.460 to 223.498, inclusive, and
section 11.3 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 223.462 to 223.470, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 11.7. NRS 223.486 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.486 1. The Director shall, in consultation with the
Nevada Advisory Council on Federal Assistance created by NRS
358.020, develop and may periodically revise a State Plan for
Maximizing Federal Assistance, which must identify:
(a) Methods for expanding opportunities for obtaining federal
assistance, including, without limitation, expanding opportunities
for obtaining matching funds for federal assistance through the
Nevada Grant Matching Program created by NRS 223.490;
(b) Methods for streamlining process, regulatory, structural and
other barriers to the acquisition of federal assistance that exist at
each level of federal, state or local government;
(c) Methods for the effective administration of grants, including,
without limitation, the administration of advanced payments of
grants to private nonprofit corporations and best practices relating
to indirect cost allocation;
(d) Opportunities for:
(1) Reducing administrative costs associated with obtaining
federal assistance; and
(2) Coordination between state agencies, local agencies,
tribal governments and nonprofit organizations to avoid duplication
and achieve common goals;
(e) Specific tasks which must be performed to improve the
administration of grants and maximize the amount of federal
assistance received by this State and a schedule for implementing
any such tasks;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(f) Performance metrics and targets relating to obtaining and
maximizing federal assistance and improving the administration of
grants; and
(g) Best practices for considering whether to respond to a grant
opportunity, including, without limitation, the monetary and
programmatic cost of implementing a grant.
2. The Director shall post the State Plan for Maximizing
Federal Assistance on the Internet website maintained by the Office.
Sec. 12. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 13. The provisions of this act apply only to a grant, as
defined in section 3 of this act, which is executed, renewed or
extended on or after July 1, 2026.
Sec. 14. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)